Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Subarticle B. Shares

§ 17-17-110.
Notice of statutory close corporations status on issued shares.

The following statement must appear conspicuously on each share certificate issued by a statutory close corporation:

The rights of shareholders in a statutory close corporation may differ materially from the rights of shareholders in other corporations. Copies of the articles of incorporation and bylaws, shareholders’ agreements, and other documents, any of which may restrict transfers and affect voting and other rights, may be obtained by a shareholder on written request to the corporation.

Within a reasonable time after the issuance or transfer of uncertificated shares, the corporation shall send to the shareholders a written notice containing the information required by subsection (a) of this section.

The notice required by this section satisfies all requirements of this chapter and of W.S.

17-16-627

that notice of share transfer restrictions be given.

A person claiming an interest in shares of a statutory close corporation which has complied with the notice requirement of this section is bound by the documents referred to in the notice. A person claiming an interest in shares of a statutory close corporation which has not complied with the notice requirement of this section is bound by any documents of which he, or a person through whom he claims, has knowledge or notice.

A corporation shall provide to any shareholder upon his written request and without charge copies of provisions that restrict transfer or affect voting or other rights of shareholders appearing in articles of incorporation, bylaws, or shareholders’ or voting trust agreements filed with the corporation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-111.
Share transfer prohibition.

An interest in shares of a statutory close corporation may not be voluntarily or involuntarily transferred, by operation of law or otherwise, except to the extent permitted by the articles of incorporation or under W.S.

17-17-112

or pursuant to a buy-sell agreement entered into by all the shareholders.

Except to the extent the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, this section does not apply to a transfer:

To the corporation or to any other holder of the same class or series of shares;

To members of the shareholder’s immediate family, or to a trust, all of whose beneficiaries are members of the shareholder’s immediate family, which immediate family consists of his spouse, parents, lineal descendants, including adopted children and stepchildren, and the spouse of any lineal descendant, and brothers and sisters;

That has been approved in writing by all of the holders of the corporation’s shares having general voting rights;

To a personal representative upon the death of a shareholder or to a trustee or receiver as the result of a bankruptcy, insolvency, dissolution or similar proceeding brought by or against a shareholder;

By merger, consolidation or share exchange under W.S.

17-16-1101

through

17-16-1114

, or an exchange of existing shares for other shares of a different class or series in the corporation;

By a pledge as collateral for a loan that does not grant the pledgee any voting rights possessed by the pledgor; or

Made after termination of the corporation’s status as a statutory close corporation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-112.
Share transfer after first refusal by corporation.

A person desiring to transfer shares of a statutory close corporation subject to the transfer prohibition of W.S.

17-17-111

must first offer them to the corporation by obtaining an offer to purchase the shares for cash from a third person who is eligible to purchase the shares under subsection (b) of this section. The offer by the third person must be in writing and state the offeror’s name and address, the number and class, or series, of shares offered, the offering price per share, and the other terms of the offer.

A third person is eligible to purchase the shares if:

He is eligible to become a qualified shareholder under any federal or state tax statute the corporation has adopted and he agrees in writing not to terminate his qualification without the approval of the remaining shareholders; and

His purchase of the shares will not impose a personal holding company tax or similar federal or state penalty tax on the corporation.

The person desiring to transfer shares shall deliver the offer to the corporation, and by doing so offers to sell the shares to the corporation on the terms of the offer. Within twenty (20) days after the corporation receives the offer, the corporation shall call a special shareholders’ meeting, to be held not more than forty (40) days after the call, to decide whether the corporation should purchase all, but not less than all, of the offered shares. The offer must be approved by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of votes entitled to be cast at the meeting, excluding votes in respect of the shares covered by the offer.

The corporation must deliver to the offering shareholder written notice of acceptance within seventy-five (75) days after receiving the offer or the offer is rejected. If the corporation makes a counteroffer, the shareholder must deliver to the corporation written notice of acceptance within fifteen (15) days after receiving the counteroffer or the counteroffer is rejected. If the corporation accepts the original offer or the shareholder accepts the corporation’s counteroffer, the shareholder shall deliver to the corporation duly endorsed certificates for the shares, or instruct the corporation in writing to transfer the shares if uncertificated, within twenty (20) days after the effective date of the notice of acceptance. The corporation may specifically enforce the shareholder’s delivery or instruction obligation under this subsection.

A corporation accepting an offer to purchase shares under this section may allocate some or all of the shares to one (1) or more of its shareholders or to other persons if all the shareholders voting in favor of the purchase approve the allocation. If the corporation has more than one (1) class or series of shares, however, the remaining holders of the class or series of shares being purchased are entitled to a first option to purchase the shares not purchased by the corporation in proportion to their shareholdings or in some other proportion agreed to by all the shareholders participating in the purchase.

If an offer to purchase shares under this section is rejected, the offering shareholder, for a period of one hundred twenty (120) days after the corporation received his offer, is entitled to transfer to the third person offeror all, but not less than all, of the offered shares in accordance with the terms of his offer to the corporation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-113.
Attempted share transfer in breach of prohibition.

An attempt to transfer shares in a statutory close corporation in violation of a prohibition against transfer binding on the transferee is ineffective.

An attempt to transfer shares in a statutory close corporation in violation of a prohibition against transfer that is not binding on the transferee, either because the notice required by W.S.

17-17-110

was not given or because the prohibition is held unenforceable by a court, gives the corporation an option to purchase the shares from the transferee for the same price and on the same terms that he purchased them. To exercise its option, the corporation must give the transferee written notice within thirty (30) days after they are presented for registration in the transferee’s name. The corporation may specifically enforce the transferee’s sale obligation upon exercise of its purchase option.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-114.
Compulsory purchase of shares after death of shareholder.

This section, and W.S.

17-17-115

through

17-17-117

, apply to a statutory close corporation only if so provided in its articles of incorporation. If these sections apply, the personal representative of the estate or the surviving joint tenant of a deceased shareholder may require the corporation to purchase or cause to be purchased all, but not less than all, of the decedent’s shares or jointly owned shares or to be dissolved.

The provisions of W.S.

17-17-115

through

17-17-117

may be modified only if the modification is set forth or referred to in the articles of incorporation.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation to provide for application of W.S.

17-17-115

through

17-17-117

, or to modify or delete the provisions of these sections, must be approved by the holders of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes of each class or series of shares of the statutory close corporation, voting as separate voting groups, whether or not otherwise entitled to vote on amendments. If the corporation has no shareholders when the amendment is proposed, it must be approved by at least two-thirds (2/3) of the subscribers for shares, if any, or, if none, by all of the incorporators.

A shareholder who votes against an amendment to modify or delete the provisions of W.S.

17-17-115

through

17-17-117

is entitled to dissenters’ rights under W.S.

17-16-1301

through

17-16-1331

if the amendment upon adoption terminates or substantially alters his existing rights under these sections to have his shares purchased.

A shareholder may waive his and his estate’s rights under W.S.

17-17-115

through

17-17-117

by a signed writing.

W.S.

17-17-115

through

17-17-117

do not prohibit any other agreement providing for the purchase of shares upon a shareholder’s death, nor do they prevent a shareholder from enforcing any remedy he has independent of these sections.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “of” for “or” after “or series” in (c).

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 17-17-115.
Exercise of compulsory purchase right.

A person entitled and desiring to exercise the compulsory purchase right described in W.S.

17-17-114

must deliver a written notice to the corporation, within one hundred twenty (120) days after the death of the shareholder, describing the number and class or series of shares beneficially owned by the decedent and requesting that the corporation offer to purchase the shares.

Within twenty (20) days after the effective date of the notice, the corporation shall call a special shareholders’ meeting, to be held not more than forty (40) days after the call, to decide whether the corporation should offer to purchase the shares. A purchase offer must be approved by the affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of votes entitled to be cast at the meeting, excluding votes in respect of the shares covered by the notice.

The corporation must deliver a purchase offer to the person requesting it within seventy-five (75) days after the effective date of the request notice. A purchase offer must be accompanied by the corporation’s balance sheet as of the end of a fiscal year ending not more than sixteen (16) months before the effective date of the request notice, an income statement for that year, a statement of changes in shareholders’ equity for that year, and the latest available interim financial statements, if any. The person must accept the purchase offer in writing within fifteen (15) days after receiving it or the offer is rejected.

A corporation agreeing to purchase shares under this section may allocate some or all of the shares to one (1) or more of its shareholders or to other persons if all the shareholders voting in favor of the purchase offer approve the allocation. If the corporation has more than one (1) class or series of shares, however, the remaining holders of the class or series of shares being purchased are entitled to a first option to purchase the shares not purchased by the corporation in proportion to their shareholdings or in some other proportion agreed to by all the shareholders participating in the purchase.

If price and other terms of a compulsory purchase of shares are fixed or are to be determined by the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a written agreement, the price and terms so fixed or determined govern the compulsory purchase unless the purchaser defaults, in which event the buyer is entitled to commence a proceeding for dissolution under W.S.

17-17-116

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-116.
Court action to compel purchase.

If an offer to purchase shares made under W.S.

17-17-115

is rejected, or if no offer is made, the person exercising the compulsory purchase right may commence a proceeding against the corporation to compel the purchase in the district court of the county where the corporation’s principal office, or, if none in this state, its registered office, is located. The corporation at its expense shall notify in writing all of its shareholders, and any other person the court directs, of the commencement of the proceeding. The jurisdiction of the court in which the proceeding is commenced under this subsection is plenary and exclusive.

The court shall determine the fair value of the shares subject to compulsory purchase in accordance with the standards set forth in W.S.

17-17-142

together with terms for the purchase. Upon making these determinations the court shall order the corporation to purchase or cause the purchase of the shares or empower the person exercising the compulsory purchase right to have the corporation dissolved.

After the purchase order is entered, the corporation may petition the court to modify the terms of purchase and the court may do so if it finds that changes in the financial or legal ability of the corporation or other purchaser to complete the purchase justify a modification.

If the corporation or other purchaser does not make a payment required by the court’s order within thirty (30) days of its due date, the seller may petition the court to dissolve the corporation and, absent a showing of good cause for not making the payment, the court shall do so.

A person making a payment to prevent or cure a default by the corporation or other purchaser is entitled to recover the payment from the defaulter.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.

§ 17-17-117.
Court costs and other expenses.

The court in a proceeding commenced under W.S.

17-17-116

shall determine the total costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court and of counsel and experts employed by the parties. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the court shall assess these costs equally against the corporation and the party exercising the compulsory purchase right.

The court may assess all or a portion of the total costs of the proceeding:

Against the person exercising the compulsory purchase right if the court finds that the fair value of the shares does not substantially exceed the corporation’s last purchase offer made before commencement of the proceeding and that the person’s failure to accept the offer was arbitrary, or otherwise not in good faith; or

Against the corporation if the court finds that the fair value of the shares substantially exceeds the corporation’s last sale offer made before commencement of the proceeding and that the offer was arbitrary, or otherwise not made in good faith.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 1.